Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1170.02
Requests; second presentation prohibited.

No request which has been once presented to the Department of Administrative Services and has been disallowed in whole or in part shall ever be again presented to such office or in any manner acted upon by it but shall be forever barred.

Laws 1877, § 4, p. 203;

R.S.1913, § 6683;

C.S.1922, § 6220;

C.S.1929, § 77-2609;

R.S.1943, § 77-2409;

Laws 1965, c. 538, § 27, p. 1714;

R.S.1943, (1986), § 77-2409;

Laws 1988, LB 864, § 15.